District of Columbia statutes.
42-609

Warranties void as to heirs; life tenants and certain parties not in possession.

All warranties which shall be made by any tenant for life, of any lands, tenements or hereditaments, the same descending or coming to any person in reversion or remainder, shall be void and of none effect, and likewise all collateral warranties, of any lands, tenements or hereditaments, by any ancestor, who has no estate of inheritance in possession in the same shall be void against the heir.

4 Anne, ch. 16, § 21, 1705
Kilty Rep., 246
Alex. Br. Stat. 662
Comp. Stat., D.C., 496, § 33
1981 Ed., § 45-509.
1973 Ed., § 45-309.